Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 19 Gambling and Lotteries

11-19-1.
Forms of gambling prohibited.

Every person who shall, directly or indirectly, set up, put forth, carry on, promote, or draw, publicly or privately, any lottery, chance, game, or device of any nature or kind whatsoever, or by whatsoever name it may be called, for the purpose of exposing, setting for sale or disposing of any money, houses, lands, merchandise, or articles of value, or shall sell or expose to sale lottery policies, purporting to be governed by the drawing of any public or private lottery, or shall sign or endorse any book, document, or paper whatsoever, for the purpose of enabling others to sell, or expose to sale, lottery policies, except as authorized in this chapter and in title 41 and chapters 61 and 61.2 of title 42, shall be deemed guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years or be fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-1

; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 406, § 4; P.L. 1982, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-1.1.
Lotteries permitted.

Any state, city, town, ward, or district committee elected pursuant to the provisions of title 17 or certified candidates, but not both, as defined in title 17, shall be allowed to conduct that lottery commonly known as a “twenty (20) week club” or conduct a raffle once within a twelve (12) month period subsequent to notification to the Rhode Island lottery commission. For the purposes of this section a “certified candidate” does not include any state, city, town, ward, or district committee person.

Credit unions may conduct “savings promotion raffles” as authorized by §

19-5-29

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 222, § 3.

11-19-2.
Unauthorized sale of lottery tickets.

Every person not authorized by the Rhode Island state police who shall sell or expose to sale any ticket, or certificate in the nature of a ticket, or share in any ticket or certificate in the nature of a ticket, in any lottery set up within or without this state, shall be fined for every such ticket, certificate or share of the ticket or certificate by that person sold or exposed to sale not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-2

; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1.

11-19-3.
Instruments given for lottery tickets void.

All notes, obligations, securities, or promises whatsoever, given for the purchase of any lottery ticket or certificate, lottery policy, or of any document or paper taken or received for the purpose of enabling others to sell or dispose of lottery tickets or lottery policies, shall be null and void.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-3

.

11-19-4.
Recovery of lottery ticket value by holder.

The purchaser or receiver of any lottery ticket or certificate in the nature of a lottery ticket, or share in either, not authorized by the Rhode Island state police whether it shall have been paid for in money, or however received, even though by way of gift, for the purpose of enabling the seller or giver to dispose of any article or piece of property, real, personal, or mixed, shall recover back the amount paid by him or her, or the value at which, according to the proof, the ticket or certificate may be reckoned in the transaction, as the case may be, from the person from whom the ticket or policy was purchased or received, in an action of the case for money had and received.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-4

; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1.

11-19-5.
Acts in aid of policy game.

Whoever not authorized by the Rhode Island state police keeps, sets up, promotes, or is concerned as owner, agent clerk, or in any other manner, in managing any policy-lottery or policy-shop, or writes, prints, sells, transfers, or delivers any ticket, certificate, slip, bill, token, or other device purporting or designed to guarantee or assure to any person, or to entitle any person to a chance of drawing or obtaining any prize or thing of value to be drawn in any lottery, or in the game or device commonly known as policy-lottery or policy, or for that person or another person writes, prints, sells, or transfers or delivers, or has in his or her possession for the purpose of sale, transfer, or delivery, or in any way aids in selling, exchanging, negotiating, transferring, or delivering, a chance or ticket in any lottery, or in the game or device commonly known as policy-lottery or policy, or any such bill, slip, certificate, token, or other device, or who sells or offers to sell what are commonly called lottery-policies, or who endorses a book or other document, for the purpose of enabling others to sell or offer to sell lottery-policies, or shall receive, register, record, forward or purport or pretend to forward, or undertake to forward, or receive, and agree to forward, to or for a lottery, or to or for any particular lottery, or to any person, within or without this state, any money, thing, or consideration of value, to purchase an interest or share in any lottery, or to obtain or secure for any person what is commonly called a lottery-policy, or a chance of drawing or obtaining any prize or thing of value to be drawn in any lottery, or in the game or device commonly called policy-lottery or policy, or who shall receive or offer to receive any money, thing, or consideration of value to be forwarded to or for a lottery, or to or for any particular lottery, or to any person to invest in a lottery within or outside this state, whether it actually exists or not, or whether any drawing of it, or any act to allot any prize or thing of value, takes place or not, or whether there is any such person or not, or whoever shall have in his or her possession, knowingly, any bill, slip, certificate, token, or other device, or article of any kind such as is used in carrying on, promoting, or playing the game commonly known as policy-lottery or policy, shall, upon conviction, be punished by fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment not exceeding one year, and upon a second conviction of a violation of this section shall be imprisoned for a period not less than one nor more than five (5) years. Provided, that the prohibition against possession of these items shall not apply to lottery tickets of any kind if the state of origin of the tickets or devices has legally authorized its issuance or sale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 37; P.L. 1909, ch. 376, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-5

; P.L. 1972, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1.

11-19-6.
Possession of policy devices as evidence of knowledge.

The possession, by any person not authorized by the Rhode Island state police other than a public official in the course of his or her duty, of any bill, slip, certificate, token, or other device, or article of any kind such as is used in carrying on, promoting, or playing the game commonly known as lottery-policy or policy, shall be presumptive evidence of possession of that item knowingly and in violation of §

11-19-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 376, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-6

; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1.

11-19-7.
Judicial notice of policy methods.

Any court or magistrate having criminal jurisdiction may take judicial notice of the general methods and character of lotteries, policy-lotteries, of the game called policy, pools, or combination bets, and the buying and selling of pools and registering of bets, not authorized by the Rhode Island state police.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 376, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-7

; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1.

11-19-8.
Policy devices as evidence of existence of game.

In the trial of a complaint or indictment to which it may be relevant any lottery, policy, or pool ticket, certificate, slip, or check, manifold, or other policy or pool book or sheet, or memorandum of any pool or sale of pools, or of a bet or odds, or combination bet, or any other implement, apparatus, materials, or articles of a character commonly employed in or in connection with lotteries, policy-lotteries, or policy, the buying or selling of pools, or registering of bets, or other form of gaming not authorized by the Rhode Island state police shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and unlawful character of a lottery, policy-lottery, or game, pool or pools, bet, game, or hazard, or other form of gaming in which like articles are commonly used, and that the article has relation to it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 376, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-8

; P.L. 1975, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 309, § 1.

11-19-9.
Illegal trading stamps and coupons.

All schemes and devices by which any person or corporation shall sell, give, or distribute any stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon, or other similar device to any purchaser of goods, wares, or merchandise, which will entitle the holder of the stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon, or other similar device, on presentation of it, either singly or in definite numbers, to receive either directly from the vendor or indirectly through any other person or corporation, some indefinite and undescribed article, the nature and value of which are unknown to the purchaser of the goods, wares, and merchandise at the time of the purchase of the merchandise, are declared to partake so much of the nature of a lottery as to be detrimental to the public morals, and are declared to be illegal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 842, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-9

.

11-19-10.
Distribution of illegal stamps or coupons.

No person or corporation shall sell, give, or distribute any stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon or other similar device, to any purchaser of goods, wares, or merchandise, which will entitle the holder of the stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon, or other similar device, on presentation of it, either singly or in definite numbers, to receive either directly from the vendor or indirectly through any other person or corporation, some indefinite and undescribed article, the nature and value of which are unknown to the purchaser of the goods, wares, and merchandise at the time of their purchase.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 842, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-10

.

11-19-11.
Stamps and coupons as inducement to purchase goods.

No person or corporation shall, either directly or indirectly, give, sell, or distribute any stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon, or other similar device with the promise, expressed or implied, as an inducement to the purchase of some article of goods, wares, or merchandise, that the holder of the stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon, or other similar device is to receive in return, on presentation, some gift, prize, or gratuity, the nature and value of which are unknown to the purchase of the goods, wares, or merchandise at the time of their purchase, the promise to be fulfilled only upon the presentation of the stamp, trading-stamp, cash discount stamp, amusement stamp, check, coupon, or other similar device, together with the number of like stamps, trading-stamps, cash discount stamps, amusement stamps, checks, coupons, or other similar devices, as the issuer or redeemer may elect shall be redeemed at any one time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 842, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-11

.

11-19-12.
Penalty for stamp and coupon violations.

Whoever shall violate any provision of §§

11-19-9

—

11-19-11

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and for each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for a term not exceeding three (3) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 842, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 8; P.L. 1931, ch. 1691, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-12

.

11-19-13.
Door prizes exempt.

Nothing in §§

11-19-1

—

11-19-4

or in §§

11-19-9

—

11-19-11

shall be deemed to prohibit or make illegal the annual or semiannual distribution by chance, of prizes, souvenirs, or favors by any club, society, lodge, or association at its dance, dinner, entertainment, or outing where the distribution is purely incidental to the dance, dinner, entertainment or outing or when the entire net proceeds of the dance, dinner, entertainment or outing is devoted to charity, if the club, society, lodge or association has first obtained the written permission for the distribution, in towns, from the town sergeant, in cities, from the police commission or police commissioner, if there is such an official, otherwise from the chief of police of the town or city where the dance, dinner, entertainment or outing is held, and that permitting authority is authorized to grant the permit when he or she is satisfied that the distribution comes within this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 8; P.L. 1931, ch. 1691, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-13

.

11-19-14.
Bookmaking.

Except as provided in chapter 4 of title 41 and excluding activities authorized by the division of lottery under chapters 61 and 61.2 of title 42, any person who shall engage in pool selling or bookmaking, or shall occupy or keep any room, shed, tenement, tent, or building, or any part of them, or shall occupy any place upon any public or private grounds within this state, with books, apparatus, or paraphernalia for the purpose of recording or registering bets or wagers or of buying or selling pools, or who shall record or register bets or wagers or sell pools upon the result of any trial or contest of skill, speed, or power of endurance of man or beast, or upon the result of any political nomination, appointment, or election, or, being the owner or lessee or occupant of any room, tent, tenement, shed, booth, or building, or part of them, knowingly shall permit it to be used or occupied for any of these purposes, or shall keep, exhibit, or employ any device or apparatus for the purpose of recording or registering bets or wagers, or the selling of pools, or shall become the custodian or depositary for gain, hire, or reward of any money, property, or thing of value staked, wagered, or pledged or to be wagered or pledged upon the result, or who shall receive, register, record, forward, or purport or pretend to forward to or for any race course, or person, within or outside this state, any money, thing, or consideration of value bet or wagered, or money, thing, or consideration of value offered for the purpose of being bet or wagered upon the speed or endurance of any man or beast; or who shall occupy any place or building or part of it with books, papers, apparatus, or paraphernalia for the purpose of receiving or pretending to receive, or for recording or registering, or for forwarding or pretending or attempting to forward in any manner whatsoever, any money, thing, or consideration of value bet or wagered or to be bet or wagered for any other person, or who shall receive or offer to receive any money, thing, or consideration of value bet or to be bet at any race track within or without this state, or who shall aid, assist, or abet in any manner in any of the acts forbidden by this section, shall upon conviction be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment not exceeding one year, and upon a second conviction of a violation of this section shall be imprisoned for a period not less than one nor more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-14

; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 4, § 7.

11-19-14.1.
Bookmaking at racetrack or fronton — Entry by convicted bookmakers prohibited.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

11-19-14

, any person who shall engage in bookmaking activities while on the premises of a racetrack or fronton facility shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has been convicted of the crime of bookmaking in the state of Rhode Island or other state to enter or visit any racetrack or fronton facility and, upon conviction, that person shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) and/or imprisonment not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 236, § 1.

11-19-15.
Betting on horses.

Except as provided in chapter 4 of title 41, every person who shall make any bet or lay any wager of any kind upon any horse, to start, run, or trot, shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-15

.

11-19-16.
Forfeiture of horses used in unlawful race.

Except as provided in title 41, every person who shall knowingly suffer or permit any horse belonging to him or her or of which he or she has the care and charge to start, run, or trot for any bet or wager shall forfeit the horse starting, running, or trotting to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-16

.

11-19-17.
Invalidity of instruments won in bets on races or fights.

All bonds, notes, judgments, mortgages, deeds or other securities, as well as promises, given or made for money, lands, houses, or other property, or article or piece of property, real, personal, or mixed, won at any game, or by betting at any race or fight, or for the repayment of money knowingly lent for such gaming or betting, shall be utterly void.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-17

.

11-19-18.
Keeping of gambling places or devices — Acting as dealer, banker, or lookout.

Every person who shall keep or suffer to be kept any building, room, booth, shed, tent, arbor, or any other place, or any automobile, bus, coach, van, truck, trainer, railway or railroad car, or any other vehicle in any city or town of this state, or in any vessel, boat, or raft upon any of the waters of Narragansett Bay, to be used or occupied for the purpose of gambling, or playing at any game or games of chance of any kind whatsoever, for money or other valuable consideration, or shall keep, exhibit, or suffer to be kept or exhibited upon premises or in a vehicle belonging to that person under his or her control, any cards, dice, table, bowls, wheel of fortune, shuffleboard, or billiard table, or any device, implement, or apparatus whatsoever to be used in gambling or playing at any game or games of chance for money or other valuable consideration, or who shall be guilty of dealing Faro, or banking for others to deal Faro, or acting as lookout, gamekeeper, or assistant for the game of Faro or any other banking game where money or property is dependent on the result, shall be taken and held to be a common gambler and shall be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years or be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor less than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 9; P.L. 1956, ch. 3759, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-18

.

11-19-19.
Revocation of license of gambling place.

If a person in violation of §

11-19-18

is a tavernkeeper, innholder, retailer, or keeper of any other house or place of public resort which is licensed, that license shall in addition be declared null and void by the court in which he or she shall be convicted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-19

; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 4.

11-19-20.
Inducing others to visit gambling place.

Every person who shall, on any pretext whatsoever, invite, entice, persuade, or induce any other person to visit any house, room, or other place kept for the purpose of gambling, with the intent that that other person shall at that place engage in gambling or playing at any game of chance, for money or other valuable consideration, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and be imprisoned one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-20

.

11-19-21.
Frequenting gambling place.

Every person who shall frequent any gambling house or place where gaming is practiced or carried on, not in the performance of official duty and not being the landlord of that place entering to view the premises, shall be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-21

.

11-19-22.
Renting for gambling purposes.

Every person who shall let or knowingly permit to be occupied any house, shop, or place belonging to or under the control of that person, to be used as a gambling house or place where gambling is carried on, or as a place where pools are sold, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-22

.

11-19-23.
Lease voided by gambling.

Every lease of any house, shop, or place used as a gambling house or place where gaming is practiced or carried on, or where pools are bought or sold, shall be void, and no notice to the occupant other than a demand for the possession of the premises, shall be necessary to eject the occupant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-23

.

11-19-24.
Search warrants and forfeitures of gambling apparatus.

Search warrants to search for and seize gambling implements, apparatus, paraphernalia, slips, tickets, and other property and devices kept, possessed or used in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or as a means of committing a violation of this chapter, may be issued as provided by law in chapter 5 of title 12; and all implements, apparatus, paraphernalia, slips, tickets, or other gambling apparatus or devices found by any officer in executing a search warrant or which shall be produced and brought into court shall be forfeited to the state, and further proceedings shall be had thereon for their forfeiture as is prescribed by law in chapter 21 of title 12 and upon entry of final judgment of forfeiture shall be destroyed by order of the court.

In addition, those items of personal property other than gambling apparatus and devices, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles and money or negotiable instruments which were kept, possessed, or used in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter and which have a monetary value may be seized and forfeited, and further proceedings shall be had for their forfeiture as is prescribed by law in chapter 21 of title 12 and the further provisions of this section; provided, that no property or money used by any person shall be forfeited under the provisions of this chapter unless it shall appear that the owner of the property or money had knowledge, actual or constructive, and was a consenting party to the alleged illegal act.

Property taken or detained under this section shall not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure and whenever property or money is forfeited under this chapter it shall be utilized as follows:

Where the seized property is a vessel, vehicle, aircraft, or other personal property, it may be retained and used by the law enforcement agency that seized the property where the use of the property is reasonably related to the law enforcement duties of the seizing agency. If the seized property is a motor vehicle which is inappropriate for use by law enforcement agency due to style, size or color, the seizing agency shall be allowed to apply the proceeds of sale or the trade in value of the vehicle towards the purchase of an appropriate vehicle for use for activities reasonably related to law enforcement duties.

The law enforcement agency may sell any forfeited property which is not required by this chapter to be destroyed and which is not harmful to the public. The proceeds from the sale are to be distributed in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection.

As to the proceeds from the sale of seized property as referred to in subdivision (2) of this subsection and as to personal property referred to in subsection (a) of this section, the distribution shall be as follows:

All proceeds of the forfeiture of real or personal property shall be distributed as follows:

Twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds shall be provided to the attorney general’s department to be used to further law enforcement activities pursuant to this chapter including, but not limited to, investigations, prosecutions, and the administration of this chapter.

Eighty percent (80%) of the proceeds shall be divided among the state and local law enforcement agencies proportionately based upon their contribution to the investigation of the criminal activity related to the asset being forfeited.

The law enforcement agencies involved in the investigation with the assistance of the attorney general shall by agreement determine the respective proportionate share to be received by each agency. If the agencies are unable to reach agreement, application shall be made by one or more of the agencies involved to the presiding justice of the superior court, who shall determine the respective proportionate share attributable to each law enforcement agency. The proceeds from all forfeitures shall be held by the general treasurer in a separate account until such time as an allocation is determined by agreement of the agencies or by the presiding justice. It shall be the duty and responsibility of the general treasurer to disburse the allocated funds from the separate account to the respective law enforcement agencies.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 12; P.L. 1912, ch. 835, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 12; P.L. 1950, ch. 2464, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-24

; P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 7; P.L. 1989, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 370, § 1.

11-19-25.
Repealed.

11-19-26.
Destruction of apparatus seized.

Upon final judgment of forfeiture of implements or apparatus pursuant to §

11-19-24

, either in the original or appellate court, or upon forfeiture of the recognizance given by the claimant to prosecute his or her appeal according to law, the court shall order in writing those implements and apparatus to be destroyed by any officer authorized to serve the criminal process of the court, which officer shall make return of his or her doings upon the order to the court as in other cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-26

; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 4.

11-19-27.
Repealed.

11-19-28.
Fees for seizure and removal of gambling apparatus.

In addition to the fees allowed by law, the officer who shall serve any warrant for the seizure of any gambling implements or apparatus under the provisions of this chapter shall be allowed the sum of one dollar ($1.00), and for the removing of any gambling implements or apparatus so seized to a place of safety, one dollar ($1.00) and all necessary expenses incurred in removal. These fees shall be included in the bill of costs and taxed by the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

11-19-28

.

11-19-29.
Repealed.

11-19-30.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply within this chapter:

“Charitable organization” means any benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, patriotic, social service, civic, fraternal, police, labor, religious, eleemosynary person, and/or persons holding themselves out to be a charitable organization.

“Charitable purpose” means any benevolent, educational, humane, patriotic, social service, civic, fraternal, police, labor, religious, or eleemosynary purpose, provided that no part of the net earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

“Department” means the division of state police unless otherwise described.

“Director” means the superintendent of state police or the director’s designee.

“Permitted game of chance” means the game commonly known as “Bingo” or “Beano” or substantially the same game under any other name, or a raffle or lottery or that lottery commonly known as a “twenty (20) week club”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-30.1 — 11-19-30.3.
Repealed.

11-19-31.
Registration of charitable organizations.

No charitable organization which intends to conduct a permitted game of chance within the state of Rhode Island shall conduct a game unless it shall file a registration statement with the department upon prescribed forms and receives a certificate of approval.

In addition, in order to obtain a renewal of registration, charitable organizations shall file the statements required by this chapter prior to June 1st of each year.

It shall be the duty of the president, chair, or principal officer of a charitable organization to file the statements required under this chapter. These statements shall be sworn to and shall contain the following information:

The name of the organization and the purpose for which it was organized.

The principal address of the organization and the address of any offices in this state. If the organization does not maintain an office, the name and address of the person having custody of its financial records.

The place where and the date when the organization was legally established and the form of its organization.

The names and addresses of the officers, directors, and/or trustees of the organization and the names and addresses of officers, staff, and/or members who receive a salary or any other form of compensation, the source of which is the proceeds from the permitted games of chance subject to subdivision (9) of this subsection.

A copy of the annual financial statement of the organization audited by an independent public accountant licensed by the state of Rhode Island for the organization’s immediately preceding fiscal year, or a copy of a financial statement covering, in a consolidated report, complete information as to all the preceding year’s fund-raising from the above-mentioned games showing kind and amount of funds raised, costs and expenses incidental to it, and allocation or disbursements of funds raised.

The general purpose or purposes for which the proceeds from the game shall be used.

The name or names under which it intends to conduct the game.

The names of the individuals or officers of the organization who will have final responsibility for the custody of the proceeds from the game.

A listing of the names, addresses and the compensation of all individuals, directors, officers, agents, servants, and/or employees of the organization who receive compensation, commission, or other remuneration, directly or indirectly, from the gross receipts of such games in excess of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) annually.

The names of the individuals or officers of the organization responsible for the final distribution of the proceeds. The director or the director’s designee shall examine each initial application of charitable organizations for the right to conduct the above-mentioned games and each renewal application of charitable organizations for the right to conduct such games and if found to be in conformity with the requirements of this chapter and all relevant rules and regulations it shall be approved for registration.

The registration forms and any other documents prescribed by the department shall be signed by an authorized officer, an independent public accountant, and by the chief fiscal officer of the charitable organization and shall be verified under oath.

The department shall make or cause to be made any investigation of any applicant that it shall deem necessary. As a result of its investigation and action, the department shall certify to the local police department or local licensing authority its approval or disapproval of the application. No applicant shall be approved if one or more of the following facts is found to exist:

That one or more of the statements in the application are not true;

That the applicant is or has engaged in a fraudulent transaction or enterprise;

That the game would be a fraud upon the public;

That game expenses during any of the three (3) years immediately preceding the date of application have exceeded twenty-five percent (25%) of the total gross money or gross receipts raised or received by reason of the games. In the event special facts or circumstances are presented showing that expenses higher than twenty-five percent (25%) were not unreasonable, the department, pursuant to rule and regulation, has the discretion to allow the higher expenses;

That the expected cost of conducting the games for the specific year for which the application will exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total gross money or receipts to be raised or received by reason of the games; or

That the activities to be financed will be incompatible with the health, safety, or welfare of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1.

11-19-32.
Operation of bingo games.

Any charitable organization approved by the department may promote, carry on, or conduct the game of bingo provided as follows:

The game is conducted by members of the organization; provided, however, that the members shall be permitted to employ one or more persons to carry on or conduct the game who are not members of the organization; and provided, further, that any person who is a member or a worker of the organization which promotes, carries on or conducts the game shall be permitted to be a member or worker of another organization that promotes, carries on or conducts the game of bingo.

No person in the actual or constructive management and control of the game receives any compensation for services connected to the game or receives any compensation from the gross receipts of the game.

The entire net receipts of the game are applied solely to the charitable purposes of the organization. All expenses deducted from gross receipts must be reasonable and related to the actual conduct of the game.

The total amount of all expenses deducted from the gross receipts shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total annual gross receipts raised through bingo, not including monies raised through the sale of pull-tab lottery tickets.

The total prizes, in the form of cash and/or retail merchandise including prizes from winner-take-all games, which are offered or awarded do not exceed the sum of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) in any one night.

The game is carried on or conducted not more than twice in any period of one calendar week under a license issued pursuant to the provisions of §

11-19-37

.

That there be only one sponsor for each date of the proposed game and that the game shall be conducted only on the premises affiliated with the organization in conformance with rules and regulations.

That any building in which a game is played or conducted shall be used no more than three (3) times in any calendar week for conducting a game, and that no annex or subdivision of any building shall be permitted to be used to conduct a game in an attempt to increase the number of times the building may be used for bingo purposes.

The organization shall keep and maintain financial records relating to the game in accordance with rules and regulations and have the records available for inspection upon demand.

Payment of a prize in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) shall be made by check.

“Winner-take-all” games are prohibited, with the exception that each organization shall be permitted to play one optional “winner-take-all” game per night.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) years shall be permitted to play the game.

Notwithstanding any regulation to the contrary, any approved charitable organization conducting a lawful game of bingo pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be permitted to advertise their game in print media. As used in this chapter, “advertise” means an advertisement or announcement in print media containing the date, time, and place of the game, the charitable organization sponsoring and/or benefiting from the game, whether the game shall provide for a bonus building/prize pool, and the total amount of the prize pool as set forth in subdivision (14) of this section.

The game may provide for a bonus building/prize pool which would start at five hundred dollars ($500) and increase at one hundred dollar ($100) increments each week until it reaches a maximum amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Game workers may be compensated with a non-monetary gift, valued at not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per quarter and/or a total of one hundred dollars ($100) per year. Beverages and food provided without charge to volunteer workers at the game of bingo shall not be considered to be compensation for purposes of the subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 337, § 1.